District of Columbia statutes.
31-5307

Organization of societies.

(a)

A domestic society organized on or after April 29, 1998, shall be formed as follows:

(1)

Seven or more citizens of the United States, a majority of whom are residents of the District, who desire to form a fraternal benefit society may make, sign, and acknowledge, before some officer competent to take acknowledgment of deeds, articles of incorporation, in which shall be stated:

(A)

The proposed corporate name of the society, which shall not resemble the name of any society or insurance company already authorized to transact business in the District so as to be misleading or confusing;

(B)

The place where its principal office shall be located within the District;

(C)

The purposes for which it is being formed and the mode in which its corporate powers are to be exercised. Such purposes shall not include more liberal powers than are granted by this chapter; and

(D)

The names and residences of the incorporators and the names, residences, and official titles of all the officers, trustees, directors, or other persons who will manage the affairs and funds of the society for the first year or until the ensuing election, at which all such officers shall be elected by the supreme governing body. The ensuing election shall be held no later than one year from the date of issuance of the permanent certificate of authority.

(2)

Duplicate originals of the articles of incorporation, certified copies of the society’s bylaws and rules, copies of all proposed forms of certificates, applications and rates therefor, and circulars to be issued by the society and a bond conditioned upon the return to applicants of the advanced payments if the organization is not completed within one year shall be filed with the Commissioner, who may require such further information as the Commissioner deems necessary. The bond with sureties approved by the Commissioner shall be in such amount, not less than $50,000, nor more than $500,000, as required by the Commissioner. All documents filed are to be in the English language. If the Commissioner finds that the purposes of the society conform to the requirements of this chapter and all provisions of the law have been complied with, the Commissioner shall approve the articles of incorporation and issue the incorporators a preliminary certificate of authority authorizing the society to solicit members as hereinafter provided.

(b)

No preliminary certificate of authority granted under the provisions of this section shall be valid after one year from its date or after such further period, not exceeding one year, as may be authorized by the Commissioner upon cause shown, unless the 100 applicants hereinafter required have been secured and the organization has been completed as herein provided. The charter and all other proceedings thereunder shall become null and void in one year from the date of the preliminary certificate of authority, or at the expiration of the extended period, unless the society shall have completed its organization and received a certificate of authority to do business as hereinafter provided.

(c)

Upon receipt of a preliminary certificate of authority from the Commissioner, the society may solicit members for the purpose of completing its organization, shall collect from each applicant the amount of not less than one regular monthly premium in accordance with its table of rates, and shall issue to each such applicant a receipt for the amount so collected. No society shall incur any liability other than for the return of such advance premium, nor issue any certificate, nor pay, allow, or offer or promise to pay or allow, any benefit to any person until:

(1)

Actual bona fide applications for benefits have been secured aggregating at least $100,000 on not less than 100 applicants, and any necessary evidence of insurability has been furnished to and approved by the society;

(2)

At least 5 subordinate lodges have been established into which the 100 applicants have been admitted;

(3)

There has been submitted to the Commissioner, under oath of the president or secretary, or corresponding officer of the society, a list of such applicants, giving their names, addresses, date each was admitted, name and number of the subordinate lodge of which each applicant is a member, amount of benefits to be granted, and premiums therefor; and

(4)

It shall have been shown to the Commissioner, by sworn statement of the treasurer, or corresponding officer of such society, that at least 100 applicants have each paid in cash at least one regular monthly premium as herein provided, which premiums in the aggregate shall amount to at least $50,000. Advance premiums shall be held in trust during the period of organization. If the society has not qualified for a certificate of authority within one year, as herein provided, advance premiums shall be returned to applicants.

(d)

The Commissioner may make such examination and require such further information as the Commissioner deems necessary. Upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that the society has complied with all the provisions of law, the Commissioner shall issue to the society a certificate of authority to that effect and that the society is authorized to transact business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The certificate of authority shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of the society at the date of such certificate of authority to be made and filed with the Recorder of Deeds of the District. A certified copy of such record may be given in evidence with like effect as the original certificate of authority.

(e)

Any incorporated society authorized to transact business in the District at the time this chapter becomes effective shall not be required to reincorporate.

(f)

No unincorporated or voluntary association shall be permitted to transact business in the District as a fraternal benefit society.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1208, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1237.